Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1801
Act, how cited.

Sections 68-1801 to 68-1809 shall be known and may be cited
as the ICF/DD Reimbursement Protection
Act.

Laws 2004, LB 841, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB23, § 16.